Hawaii statutes.
§338-14.6 Vital statistics improvement
special fund. (a) There is established within the state treasury a
special fund to be known as the vital statistics improvement special fund. The
fund shall be administered and expended by the department of health.

(b) Moneys in the fund shall be used by the
department of health for the modernization and automation of the vital
statistics system in this State. Moneys in the fund may be used to assist in
offsetting costs for the daily operations of the system of vital statistics.

(c) The fund shall consist of fees remitted
pursuant to section 338-14.5. All realizations of the fund shall be subject to
the conditions specified in subsection (b). [L 1997, c 216, §§2, 13; am L 1999,
c 194, §1; am L 2010, c 55, §2]

Note

Deaths reported to state agencies (repealed July 1, 2016). L
2014, c 27.

Previous
Vol06_Ch0321-0344
Next